Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.20, is amended to read: 120B.20 PARENTAL CURRICULUM REVIEW. new text begin (a) new text end Each school district shall have a procedure for a parent, guardian, or an adult student, 18 years of age or older, to review the content of the instructional materials to be provided to a minor child or to an adult student and, if the parent, guardian, or adult student objects to the content, to make reasonable arrangements with school personnel for alternative instruction. Alternative instruction may be provided by the parent, guardian, or adult student if the alternative instruction, if any, offered by the school board does not meet the concerns of the parent, guardian, or adult student. The school board is not required to pay for the costs of alternative instruction provided by a parent, guardian, or adult student. School personnel may not impose an academic or other penalty upon a student merely for arranging alternative instruction under this section. School personnel may evaluate and assess the quality of the student's work. new text begin (b) A request for alternative instruction is an individual decision and does not affect access to instructional materials for other students. new text end new text begin (c) For the purposes of this section, "instructional materials" include online materials or media assigned or distributed as part of a structured district or school curricular program. new text end